Utah statutes.
78B-7-108.   Mutual protective orders prohibited.

(1)  A court may not grant a mutual order or mutual orders for protection to opposing parties, unless each party:

(a)  has filed an independent petition against the other for a protective order, and both petitions have been served;

(b)  makes a showing at a due process protective order hearing of abuse or domestic violence committed by the other party; and

(c)  demonstrates the abuse or domestic violence did not occur in self-defense.

(2)  If the court issues mutual protective orders, the circumstances justifying those orders shall be documented in the case file.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

